pt-BR: Câmeras e óptica > Câmera e acessórios ópticos > Acessórios e peças para câmeras > Unidades de zoom para lentes de câmera: Unidades de zoom digital; Unidades de zoom manual; Unidades de zoom motorizadas; Unidades de zoom óptico; Unidades servo zoom
tr: Kameralar ve Optik Malzemeler > Kamera ve Optik Aksesuarları > Fotoğraf Makinesi Parçaları ve Aksesuarları > Fotoğraf Makinesi Lens Yakınlaştırma Üniteleri: Dijital Yakınlaştırma Birimleri; Manuel Yakınlaştırma Birimleri; Motorlu Yakınlaştırma Birimleri; Optik Yakınlaştırma Birimleri; Servo Yakınlaştırma Birimleri
da: Kameraer og optik > Kamera og optik – tilbehør > Kamera – reservedele og tilbehør > Zoomobjektiver til kameraer: Digitale zoomenheder; Manuelle zoomenheder; Motoriserede zoomenheder; Optiske zoomenheder; Servo-zoomenheder
ja: カメラ・光学機器 > カメラ・光学機器アクセサリー > カメラパーツ・アクセサリー > カメラレンズズームユニット: デジタルズームユニット; マニュアルズームユニット; 電動ズームユニット; 光学ズームユニット; サーボズームユニット
ru: Камеры и оптика > Аксессуары для камер и другой оптики > Детали и аксессуары для камер > Механизмы масштабирования для объективов камер: Механизмы цифрового масштабирования; Механизмы ручного масштабирования; Механизмы механизированного масштабирования; Механизмы оптического масштабирования; Механизмы масштабирования с сервоуправлением
hu: Fényképezőgépek és optikák > Fényképezőgép- és optikai kiegészítők > Fényképezőgép-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Fényképezőgép-lencse zoom egységek: Digitális zoom egységek; Kézi zoom egységek; Motoros zoom egységek; Optikai zoom egységek; Szervo zoom egységek
es: Cámaras y ópticas > Accesorios ópticos y de cámara > Accesorios y piezas para cámaras > Unidades de zoom para objetivos de cámaras: Unidades de zoom digital; Unidades de zoom manual; Unidades de zoom motorizadas; Unidades de zoom óptico; Unidades de zoom servo
it: Fotocamere/dispositivi ottici > Accessori ottici/fotocamere > Componenti e accessori per fotocamere > Unità con obiettivi zoom per fotocamere: Unità zoom digitale; Unità zoom manuale; Unità zoom motorizzato; Unità zoom ottico; Unità zoom servo
hr-HR: Fotoaparati i optika > Dodaci za fotoaparate i optiku > Dijelovi i dodaci za fotoaparate > Objektivi za zumiranje za fotoaparate: Objektivi za digitalno zumiranje; Objektivi za ručno zumiranje; Objektivi za motorizirano zumiranje; Objektivi za optičko zumiranje; Objektivi za servo zumiranje
de: Kameras & Optik > Kamera- & Optisches Zubehör > Kamerazubehör > Zoomkomponenten für Objektive: Digitale Zoomkomponenten; Manuelle Zoomkomponenten; Motorisierte Zoomkomponenten; Optische Zoomkomponenten; Servo-Zoomkomponenten
sl-SI: Fotoaparati in optika > Dodatki za fotoaparate in optiko > Deli in dodatki za fotoaparate > Enote za povečavo objektivov fotoaparatov: Enote za digitalno povečavo; Enote za ročno povečavo; Motorizirane enote za povečavo; Enote za optično povečavo; Enote za samodejno povečavo
nb: Kameraer og optikk > Tilbehør for kameraer og optikk > Kameradeler og -tilbehør > Zoomenheter for kameraobjektiver: Digitale zoomenheter; Manuelle zoomenheter; Motoriserte zoomenheter; Optiske zoomenheter; Zoomenheter med servo
pl: Aparaty, kamery i przyrządy optyczne > Akcesoria do aparatów, kamer i przyrządów optycznych > Akcesoria i części do aparatów > Zoomy do obiektywów: Jednostki zoomu cyfrowego; Jednostki zoomu ręcznego; Zmotoryzowane jednostki zoomu; Jednostki zoomu optycznego; Jednostki serwomechanizmu zoomu
fr: Appareils photo, caméras et instruments d’optique > Accessoires pour appareils photo, caméras et instruments d’optique > Pièces et accessoires pour appareils photo et caméras > Lentilles de grossissement: Unités de zoom numérique; Unités de zoom manuel; Unités de zoom motorisé; Unités de zoom optique; Unités de zoom servo
pt-PT: Câmaras e ótica > Acessórios de câmara e ótica > Peças e acessórios de câmara > Unidades de zoom de lentes de câmara: Unidades de zoom digital; Unidades de zoom manual; Unidades de zoom motorizado; Unidades de zoom ótico; Unidades de zoom servo
zh-TW: 相機和光學元件 > 相機和光學配件 > 相機零件/配件 > 相機鏡頭放大組: 數位變焦裝置; 手動變焦裝置; 電動變焦裝置; 光學變焦裝置; 電子變焦裝置
fi: Kamerat ja optiikka > Korut ja asusteet > Kameran osat ja tarvikkeet > Kameran zoom-linssit: Digitaaliset zoom-yksiköt; Manuaaliset zoom-yksiköt; Moottoroidut zoom-yksiköt; Optiset zoom-yksiköt; Servo-zoom-yksiköt
ko: 카메라/광학 기기 > 카메라/광학 기기 부대용품 > 카메라 부품/부대용품 > 카메라 렌즈 줌 장치: 디지털 줌 장치; 수동 줌 장치; 전동 줌 장치; 광학 줌 장치; 서보 줌 장치
th: กล้องและออปติก > อุปกรณ์กล้องและออปติก > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์กล้อง > อะไหล่เลนส์ซูมของกล้อง: หน่วยซูมดิจิตอล; หน่วยซูมแบบแมนนวล; หน่วยซูมแบบใช้มอเตอร์; หน่วยซูมออปติคัล; หน่วยซูมเซอร์โว
sk-SK: Fotoaparáty a optické zariadenia > Príslušenstvo pre fotoaparáty a optické zariadenia > Diely a príslušenstvo pre fotoaparáty > Jednotky zoomu objektívu fotoaparátu: Jednotky digitálneho zoomu; Jednotky manuálneho zoomu; Motorizované jednotky zoomu; Jednotky optického zoomu; Jednotky servo zoomu
sv: Kameror och optik > Tillbehör till kamera och optik > Kameratillbehör > Zoomobjektiv för kameror: Digitala zoomenheter; Manuella zoomenheter; Motoriserade zoomenheter; Optiska zoomenheter; Servozoomenheter
lt-LT: Fotoaparatai ir optika > Fotoaparatų ir optikos priedai > Fotoaparatų dalys ir priedai > Fotoaparatų objektyvų priartinimo įrenginiai: Skaitmeniniai priartinimo įrenginiai; Rankiniai priartinimo vienetai; Motorizuoti priartinimo įrenginiai; Optiniai priartinimo įrenginiai; Priartinimo įrenginiai su servovarikliais
zh-CN: 相机与光学器件 > 相机与光学器件配件 > 相机零件/配件 > 相机镜头变焦单元: 镜头变焦单元; 手动变焦单元; 电动变焦单元; 光学变焦单元; 伺服变焦单元
el: Κάμερες & οπτικά συστήματα > Αξεσουάρ κάμερας & οπτικών συστημάτων > Ανταλλακτικά και αξεσουάρ κάμερας > Μονάδες ζουμ φακού κάμερας: Ψηφιακές μονάδες ζουμ; Χειροκίνητες μονάδες ζουμ; Μηχανοκίνητες μονάδες ζουμ; Οπτικές μονάδες ζουμ; Μονάδες ζουμ Servo
bg-BG: Фотоапарати и оптика > Аксесоари за фотоапарати и оптика > Части и аксесоари за фотоапарати > Механизми за увеличаване на обективи за фотоапарат: Механизми на цифрово увеличаване; Механизми на ръчно увеличаване; Моторизирани механизми за увеличаване; Оптични механизми за увеличаване; Серво механизми за увеличаване
en: Cameras & Optics > Camera & Optic Accessories > Camera Parts & Accessories > Camera Lens Zoom Units: Digital Zoom Units; Manual Zoom Units; Motorized Zoom Units; Optical Zoom Units; Servo Zoom Units
cs: Foto, video a optika > Fotoaparáty, kamery a optika – příslušenství > Díly a příslušenství k fotoaparátům > Zoomovací mechanismy pro fotoaparáty: Digitální zoomy; Manuální zoomy; Motorizované zoomy; Optické zoomy; Servo zoomy
ro-RO: Aparate foto și componente optice > Accesorii pentru aparate foto și componente optice > Piese și accesorii pentru aparate foto > Unități de zoom pentru obiectivul aparatului foto: Unități de zoom digitale; Unități de zoom manuale; Unități de zoom motorizate; Unități de zoom optice; Unități de zoom servo
nl: Camera's en optiek > Optische en camera-accessoires > Cameraonderdelen en -accessoires > Zoomunits voor cameralenzen: Digitale zoomunits; Handmatige zoomunits; Gemotoriseerde zoomunits; Optische zoomunits; Servo-zoomunits
vi: Máy ảnh & Quang học > Phụ kiện camera và ống kính > Linh kiện & Phụ kiện máy ảnh > Ống kính đa tiêu cự: Đơn vị zoom kỹ thuật số; Đơn vị zoom thủ công; Đơn vị zoom cơ giới; Đơn vị zoom quang học; Đơn vị zoom servo